Massachusetts, session 194th, S2480.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 59 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting the following:-
Section 5½. All benefits pursuant to section 5 of this chapter shall be adjusted annually
according the average cost of living adjustment in the commonwealth.
of 1